District of Columbia statutes.
35-211

Removal of disused tracks; penalty for noncompliance.

Whenever the track or tracks, or any part thereof, of any street-railway company in the District of Columbia shall not have been regularly operated for railway purposes upon a schedule as required by its charter for a period of 3 months, the Mayor of said District, in his discretion, may thereupon notify such company to remove said unused tracks and to place the street in good condition; and if such company shall neglect or refuse to remove said tracks and place the street in good condition within 60 days after such notice, the said company shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be liable to a fine of $10 for each and every day during which said tracks are permitted to remain upon the street or streets, or said roadway shall remain out of repair, which fine shall be recovered in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, in the name of said District, as other fines and penalties are recovered in said Court.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1302, ch. 854, § 710
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 534, ch. 1329
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)

History

This section is referenced in § 35-210.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 44-211.
1973 Ed., § 44-211.

Prior Codifications

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government